Utah statutes.
77-7-11.   Possession of warrant by arresting officer not required.
Any peace officer who has knowledge of an outstanding warrant of arrest may
arrest a person he reasonably believes to be the person described in the
warrant, without the peace officer having physical possession of the warrant.
